District of Columbia statutes.
39-124

Depository of Government publications.

The Public Library of the District of Columbia is hereby constituted a designated depository of governmental publications, and the Superintendent of Documents shall supply to such library 1 copy of each such publication, in the same form as supplied to other designated depositories.

Sept. 28, 1943, 57 Stat. 568, ch. 243
1973 Ed., § 37-111.
1981 Ed., § 37-110.